Alaska statutes. Title 44. State Government.
Article 5. General Provisions.

Editor’s notes. —

Pursuant to § 2, ch. 18, SLA 2005,
AS

44.42.900

is designated under the article heading “General Provisions.”

Sec. 44.42.900.
Definitions.

In this chapter, unless the context requires otherwise,

“commissioner” means the commissioner of transportation and public facilities;

“department” means the Department of Transportation and Public Facilities;

“transportation” or “transportation mode” includes, but is not limited to, the following means of conveyance or travel, including their related or auxiliary structures, facilities, or services: air, rail, water, highway and pipeline.

History.

(E.O. No. 39, § 2 (1977))